Tennessee, session 114, SB0874.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 43, Chapter 25, is amended by adding
the following new section:
(a) This act is known and may be cited as the "Tennessee Century Farms Act."
(b) It is the intent of the general assembly to recognize the historical significance
of family farms that have been in operation in this state for over one hundred (100) years
and to highlight their contribution to agriculture in and the economy of this state.
(c) As used in this section:
(1) "Century farm" means a farm that:
(A) Is composed of ten (10) or more acres of the original farm
owned by a founder of the farm;
(B) Produces at least one thousand dollars ($1,000) in annual
revenue;
(C) Has remained in the founder's family continuously for at least
one hundred (100) years; and
(D) Is owned in whole or in part by at least one (1) resident of this
state; and
(2) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the department of
agriculture.
SB0874
000956
- 1 -

(d) The commissioner shall establish a century farms program to recognize
century farms in continuous operation for more than one hundred (100) years in this
state for purposes of promoting awareness of century farms and the interests of
agriculture in this state.
(e) The commissioner shall:
(1) Operate the program within the existing resources of the department
of agriculture;
(2) Establish the criteria for qualification as a century farm under the
program;
(3) Designate a qualified historic preservation center to administer the
program; and
(4) Design and provide a specialty commemorative sign in recognition of
a century farm to be provided to the owner of the farm at no cost to the owner.
Commemorative signs may also be designed and provided to owners of century
farms to recognize each additional fifty (50) years that a farm remains in
continuous operation and qualifies for participation in the program. Additional
signs may be purchased by a qualified owner at a cost specified by the
commissioner. The commissioner may collaborate with the Tennessee historical
commission and the historic preservation center administering the program for
purposes of designing signs in accordance with this subdivision (e)(4).
(f) In administering the program, the historic preservation center designated
pursuant to subdivision (e)(3) shall:
(1) Maintain a database of century farms and serve as a clearing house
with respect to information on century farms and the program;
- 2 - 000956

(2) Collaborate with the department of agriculture and the Tennessee
historical commission for purposes of administering the program; and
(3) Educate the public and promote awareness with respect to
Tennessee's historic century farms in this state as well as their contribution to
agriculture in this state.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 000956